Mississippi, session 2026, SB3221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of paying salaries and travel expenses of assistant district attorneys and paying office expenses of the district attorney within the Sixth Circuit Court District for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 574,272.00. SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds appropriated under Section 1 of this act, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are provided for three (3) full-time assistant district attorneys for the Sixth Circuit Court District. SECTION 3.  None of the funds authorized in this act shall be used to reimburse the district attorney of The Sixth Circuit Court District or his staff for taxable meals incurred within the Sixth Circuit Court District. SECTION 4.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) is provided for office expenses of district attorneys as authorized by Section 25-31-8, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 5.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.